North Carolina, session 2025, HB660.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Midland for various road
improvements in the Bethel Glen Development and the Tucker Chase Development.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twelve million seven hundred thousand dollars
($12,700,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
the Town of Harrisburg to be used as follows:
(1) Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for turf fields.
(2) Nine million two hundred thousand dollars ($9,200,000) for the Harrisburg
passenger rail station.
(3) One million dollars ($1,000,000) to complete the Harrisburg YMCA building.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million nine hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,950,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Cabarrus
County to be used for Cabarrus Rowan Community Health Center to expand and sustain access
to care in the County.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Cabarrus Cooperative Christian Ministry,
Inc., a nonprofit organization, to assist members of the community experiencing crisis in the
areas of food, housing, or finances.
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H660-v-1*